District of Columbia statutes.
28:8-114

Evidentiary rules concerning certificated securities.

The following rules apply in an action on a certificated security against the issuer:

(1)

Unless specifically denied in the pleadings, each signature on a security certificate or in a necessary indorsement is admitted.

(2)

If the effectiveness of a signature is put in issue, the burden of establishing effectiveness is on the party claiming under the signature, but the signature is presumed to be genuine or authorized.

(3)

If signatures on a security certificate are admitted or established, production of the certificate entitles a holder to recover on it unless the defendant establishes a defense or a defect going to the validity of the security.

(4)

If it is shown that a defense or defect exists, the plaintiff has the burden of establishing that the plaintiff or some person under whom the plaintiff claims is a person against whom the defense or defect cannot be asserted.

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 733, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-196, § 4, 39 DCR 9165
renumbered and amended, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-240, § 2, 44 DCR 1087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:8-114.
1973 Ed., § 28:8-105.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

This section adapts the rules of negotiable instruments law concerning procedure in actions on instruments, see Section 3-308, to actions on certificated securities governed by this Article. An “action on a security” includes any action or proceeding brought against the issuer to enforce a right or interest that is part of the security, such as an action to collect principal or interest or a dividend, or to establish a right to vote or to receive a new security under an exchange offer or plan of reorganization. This section applies only to certificated securities; actions on uncertificated securities are governed by general evidentiary principles.

Definitional Cross References “Action”. Section 1-201(1).

“Burden of establishing”. Section 1-201(8).

“Certificated security”. Section 8-102(a)(4).

“Indorsement”. Section 8-102(a)(11).

“Issuer”. Section 8-201.

“Presumed”. Section 1-201(31).

“Security”. Section 8-102(a)(15).

“Security certificate”. Section 8-102(a)(16).